Illinois, session 104th, HB1852.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Horse Racing Act of 1975 is 5amended by changing Sections 3.075, 19, 19.5, 20, and 26 and by 6adding Section 19.10 as follows: 7    (230 ILCS 5/3.075)8    Sec. 3.075. (a) "Host track" means the organization 9licensee (i) conducting live thoroughbred racing between the 10hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. from the first day to the last 11day of its horse racing meet as awarded by the Board (including 12all days within that period when no live racing occurs), 13except as otherwise provided in subsections (c) and (e) of 14this Section, or (ii) conducting live standardbred racing 15between the hours of 6:30 p.m. to 6:30 a.m. of the following 16day from the first day to the last day of its horse racing meet 17as awarded by the Board (including all days within that period 18when no live racing occurs, except as otherwise provided in 19subsections (b), (d), and (e) of this Section); provided that 20the organization licensee conducts live racing no fewer than 5 21days per week with no fewer than 9 races per day, unless a 22lesser schedule of live racing is the result of (1) weather, 23unsafe track conditions, or other acts of God; (2) an   HB1852- 2 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1agreement between the organization licensee and the 2associations representing the largest number of owners, 3trainers, and standardbred drivers who race horses at that 4organization licensee's race meeting, with the Board's 5consent; or (3) a decision by the Board after a public hearing 6(in which the associations representing the owners, trainers, 7jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at that 8organization licensee's race meeting shall participate) either 9at the time racing dates are awarded or after those dates are 10awarded due to changed financial circumstances, upon a written 11petition from the organization licensee, accompanied by 12supporting financial data as requested by the Board, stating 13that the organization licensee has and will continue to incur 14significant financial losses. No organization licensee 15conducting its race meeting in a county bordering the 16Mississippi River and having a population greater than 230,000 17may be a host track for its race meeting.18    (b) (Blank).19    (c) (Blank).20    (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of 21this Section and except as otherwise provided in subsection 22(e) of this Section, in the event that 2 organization 23licensees conduct their standardbred race meetings 24concurrently on any date after January 1, 1996, between the 25hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., the organization licensee 26awarded the most racing dates between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m.   HB1852- 3 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1during the calendar year in which that concurrent racing 2occurs will be deemed the host track, provided that the 2 3organization licensees collectively conduct live standardbred 4racing between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. during the week in which 5concurrent race meetings occur no less than 5 days per week 6with no less than 9 races per day. During each week of the 7calendar year in which 2 organization licensees are conducting 8live standardbred race meetings between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 9a.m., if there is any day in that week on which only one 10organization licensee is conducting a standardbred race 11meeting between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., that organization 12licensee shall be the host track provided that the 2 13organization licensees collectively conduct live standardbred 14racing between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. during the week in which 15concurrent race meetings occur no less than 5 days per week 16with no less than 9 races per day. During each week of the 17calendar year in which 2 organization licensees are 18concurrently conducting live standardbred race meetings on one 19or more days between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., if there is any 20day in that week on which no organization licensee is 21conducting a standardbred race meeting between 6:30 p.m. and 226:30 a.m., the organization licensee conducting a standardbred 23race meeting during that week and time period that has been 24awarded the most racing dates during the calendar year between 256:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. shall be the host track, provided that 26the 2 organization licensees collectively conduct live   HB1852- 4 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1standardbred racing between 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. during the 2week in which concurrent race meetings occur no less than 5 3days per week with no less than 9 races per day. The 4requirement in this subsection (d) that live racing be 5conducted no less than 5 days per week with no less than 9 6races per day shall be subject to exceptions set forth in items 7(1), (2), and (3) of subsection (a) of Section 3.075.8    (e) During any calendar period in which no organization 9licensee has been awarded a thoroughbred race meeting, the 10host track, between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. of 11such period, shall be an organization licensee determined by 12the Board, provided the organization licensee has been awarded 13a thoroughbred race meeting in the current year and is 14eligible to be a host track.15(Source: P.A. 91-40, eff. 6-25-99.) 16    (230 ILCS 5/19)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-19)17    Sec. 19. (a) No organization license may be granted to 18conduct a horse race meeting:19        (1) except as provided in subsection (c) of Section 21 20    of this Act, to any person at any place within 35 miles of 21    any other place licensed by the Board to hold a race 22    meeting on the same date during the same hours, the 23    mileage measurement used in this subsection (a) shall be 24    certified to the Board by the Bureau of Systems and 25    Services in the Illinois Department of Transportation as   HB1852- 5 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    the most commonly used public way of vehicular travel;2        (1.5) except as provided in Section 19.10 of this Act, 3    to any person to conduct gaming under Section 56 of this 4    Act at any place within 100 miles of a track located in a 5    county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 6    borders the Mississippi River; 7        (2) to any person in default in the payment of any 8    obligation or debt due the State under this Act, provided 9    no applicant shall be deemed in default in the payment of 10    any obligation or debt due to the State under this Act as 11    long as there is pending a hearing of any kind relevant to 12    such matter;13        (3) to any person who has been convicted of the 14    violation of any law of the United States or any State law 15    which provided as all or part of its penalty imprisonment 16    in any penal institution; to any person against whom there 17    is pending a Federal or State criminal charge; to any 18    person who is or has been connected with or engaged in the 19    operation of any illegal business; to any person who does 20    not enjoy a general reputation in his community of being 21    an honest, upright, law-abiding person; provided that none 22    of the matters set forth in this subparagraph (3) shall 23    make any person ineligible to be granted an organization 24    license if the Board determines, based on circumstances of 25    any such case, that the granting of a license would not be 26    detrimental to the interests of horse racing and of the   HB1852- 6 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    public;2        (4) to any person who does not at the time of 3    application for the organization license own or have a 4    contract or lease for the possession of a finished race 5    track suitable for the type of racing intended to be held 6    by the applicant and for the accommodation of the public.7    (b) (Blank).8    (c) If any person is ineligible to receive an organization 9license because of any of the matters set forth in subsection 10(a) (2) or subsection (a) (3) of this Section, any other or 11separate person that either (i) controls, directly or 12indirectly, such ineligible person or (ii) is controlled, 13directly or indirectly, by such ineligible person or by a 14person which controls, directly or indirectly, such ineligible 15person shall also be ineligible.16(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 17    (230 ILCS 5/19.5)18    Sec. 19.5. Standardbred racetrack in Cook County. 19Notwithstanding anything in this Act to the contrary, in 20addition to organization licenses issued by the Board on the 21effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 22Assembly, the Board shall issue an organization license 23limited to standardbred racing to a racetrack located in one 24of the following townships of Cook County: Bloom, Bremen, 25Calumet, Orland, Rich, Thornton, or Worth. This additional   HB1852- 7 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1organization license shall not be issued within a 35-mile 2radius of another organization license issued by the Board on 3the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 101st General 4Assembly, unless the person having operating control of such 5racetrack has given written consent to the organization 6licensee applicant, which consent must be filed with the Board 7at or prior to the time application is made. However, the 8consent required by this Section from the person having 9operating control of such racetrack shall not be required 10after December 31, 2025. The organization license application 11shall be submitted to the Board and the Board may grant the 12organization license at any meeting of the Board. The Board 13shall examine the application within 21 days after receipt of 14the application with respect to its conformity with this Act 15and the rules adopted by the Board. If the application does not 16comply with this Act or the rules adopted by the Board, the 17application may be rejected and an organization license 18refused to the applicant, or the Board may, within 21 days 19after receipt of the application, advise the applicant of the 20deficiencies of the application under the Act or the rules of 21the Board and require the submittal of an amended application 22within a reasonable time determined by the Board; upon 23submittal of the amended application by the applicant, the 24Board may consider the application consistent with the process 25described in subsection (e-5) of Section 20. If the 26application is found to be in compliance with this Act and the   HB1852- 8 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1rules of the Board, the Board shall then issue an organization 2license to the applicant. Once the organization license is 3granted, the licensee shall have all of the current and future 4rights of existing Illinois racetracks, including, but not 5limited to, the ability to obtain an inter-track wagering 6license, the ability to obtain inter-track wagering location 7licenses, the ability to obtain an organization gaming license 8pursuant to the Illinois Gambling Act with 1,200 gaming 9positions, and the ability to offer Internet wagering on horse 10racing.11(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 102-689, eff. 12-17-21.) 12    (230 ILCS 5/19.10 new)13    Sec. 19.10. Standardbred racetrack in Macon County. 14Notwithstanding anything in this Act to the contrary, in 15addition to organization licenses issued by the Board on the 16effective date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General 17Assembly, the Board shall issue an organization license 18limited to standardbred racing to a racetrack located in Macon 19County. Any physical gaming positions issued to an 20organization licensee under this Section that also receives 21organization gaming licensee under Section 56 shall be located 22in Macon County. The organization license application shall be 23submitted to the Board and the Board may grant the 24organization license at any meeting of the Board. The Board 25shall examine the application within 21 days after receipt of   HB1852- 9 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1the application with respect to its conformity with this Act 2and the rules adopted by the Board. If the application does not 3comply with this Act or the rules adopted by the Board, the 4application may be rejected and an organization license 5refused to the applicant, or the Board may, within 21 days 6after receipt of the application, advise the applicant of the 7deficiencies of the application under this Act or the rules of 8the Board and require the submittal of an amended application 9within a reasonable time determined by the Board; upon 10submittal of the amended application by the applicant, the 11Board may consider the application consistent with the process 12described in subsection (e-5) of Section 20. If the 13application is found to be in compliance with this Act and the 14rules of the Board, the Board shall then issue an organization 15license to the applicant. Once the organization license is 16granted, the licensee shall have all of the current and future 17rights of existing Illinois racetracks, including, but not 18limited to, the ability to obtain an inter-track wagering 19license, the ability to obtain inter-track wagering location 20licenses, the ability to obtain an organization gaming license 21pursuant to the Illinois Gambling Act with 900 gaming 22positions, and the ability to offer Internet wagering on horse 23racing. 24    (230 ILCS 5/20)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-20)25    Sec. 20. (a) Any person desiring to conduct a horse race   HB1852- 10 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1meeting may apply to the Board for an organization license. 2The application shall be made on a form prescribed and 3furnished by the Board. The application shall specify: 4        (1) the dates on which it intends to conduct the horse 5    race meeting, which dates shall be provided under Section 6    21; 7        (2) the hours of each racing day between which it 8    intends to hold or conduct horse racing at such meeting; 9        (3) the location where it proposes to conduct the 10    meeting; and 11        (4) any other information the Board may reasonably 12    require.13    (b) A separate application for an organization license 14shall be filed for each horse race meeting which such person 15proposes to hold. Any such application, if made by an 16individual, or by any individual as trustee, shall be signed 17and verified under oath by such individual. If the application 18is made by individuals, then it shall be signed and verified 19under oath by at least 2 of the individuals; if the application 20is made by a partnership, an association, a corporation, a 21corporate trustee, a limited liability company, or any other 22entity, it shall be signed by an authorized officer, a 23partner, a member, or a manager, as the case may be, of the 24entity.25    (c) The application shall specify: 26        (1) the name of the persons, association, trust, or   HB1852- 11 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    corporation making such application; 2        (2) the principal address of the applicant; 3        (3) if the applicant is a trustee, the names and 4    addresses of the beneficiaries; if the applicant is a 5    corporation, the names and addresses of all officers, 6    stockholders and directors; or if such stockholders hold 7    stock as a nominee or fiduciary, the names and addresses 8    of the parties who are the beneficial owners thereof or 9    who are beneficially interested therein; if the applicant 10    is a partnership, the names and addresses of all partners, 11    general or limited; if the applicant is a limited 12    liability company, the names and addresses of the manager 13    and members; and if the applicant is any other entity, the 14    names and addresses of all officers or other authorized 15    persons of the entity.16    (d) The applicant shall execute and file with the Board a 17good faith affirmative action plan to recruit, train, and 18upgrade minorities in all classifications within the 19association.20    (e) With such application there shall be delivered to the 21Board a certified check or bank draft payable to the order of 22the Board for an amount equal to $1,000. All applications for 23the issuance of an organization license shall be filed with 24the Board before August 1 of the year prior to the year for 25which application is made and shall be acted upon by the Board 26at a meeting to be held on such date as shall be fixed by the   HB1852- 12 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1Board during the last 15 days of September of such prior year. 2At such meeting, the Board shall announce the award of the 3racing meets, live racing schedule, and designation of host 4track to the applicants and its approval or disapproval of 5each application. No announcement shall be considered binding 6until a formal order is executed by the Board, which shall be 7executed no later than October 15 of that prior year. Absent 8the agreement of the affected organization licensees, the 9Board shall not grant overlapping race meetings to 2 or more 10tracks that are within 100 miles of each other to conduct the 11thoroughbred racing.12    (e-1) The Board shall award standardbred racing dates to 13organization licensees with an organization gaming license 14pursuant to the following schedule:15        (1) For the first calendar year of operation of 16    gambling games by an organization gaming licensee under 17    this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, when a 18    single entity requests standardbred racing dates, the 19    Board shall award no fewer than 100 days of racing. The 20    100-day requirement may be reduced to no fewer than 80 21    days if no dates are requested for the first 3 months of a 22    calendar year. If more than one entity requests 23    standardbred racing dates, the Board shall award no fewer 24    than 140 days of racing between the applicants.25        (2) For the second calendar year of operation of 26    gambling games by an organization gaming licensee under   HB1852- 13 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, when a 2    single entity requests standardbred racing dates, the 3    Board shall award no fewer than 100 days of racing. The 4    100-day requirement may be reduced to no fewer than 80 5    days if no dates are requested for the first 3 months of a 6    calendar year. If more than one entity requests 7    standardbred racing dates, the Board shall award no fewer 8    than 160 days of racing between the applicants.9        (3) For the third calendar year of operation of 10    gambling games by an organization gaming licensee under 11    this amendatory Act of the 101st General Assembly, and 12    each calendar year thereafter, when a single entity 13    requests standardbred racing dates, the Board shall award 14    no fewer than 120 days of racing. The 120-day requirement 15    may be reduced to no fewer than 100 days if no dates are 16    requested for the first 3 months of a calendar year. If 17    more than one entity requests standardbred racing dates, 18    the Board shall award no fewer than 200 days of racing 19    between the applicants.20        (4) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this 21    subsection, if the Board approves an organization license 22    pursuant to Section 19.10, the Board may award fewer than 23    the minimum number of racing days, but no fewer than 60 24    days of racing, if there is consent for fewer days of 25    racing as agreed to by the organization licensee and the 26    horsemen association representing the largest number of   HB1852- 14 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who 2    race horses at that organization licensee's racing 3    meeting. 4        (5) Notwithstanding any other requirement of this 5    subsection, if the Board approves an organization license 6    pursuant to Section 19.10 before July 1, 2025, and the 7    organization licensee applies for racing days in the 8    remainder of 2025, the Board may award racing days to the 9    organization licensee in the remainder of 2025 after the 10    Board has considered the application consistent with 11    subsection (e-5). 12    An organization licensee shall apply for racing dates 13pursuant to this subsection (e-1). In awarding racing dates 14under this subsection (e-1), the Board shall have the 15discretion to allocate those standardbred racing dates among 16these organization licensees.17    (e-2) The Board shall award thoroughbred racing days to 18Cook County organization licensees pursuant to the following 19schedule:20        (1) During the first year in which only one 21    organization licensee is awarded an organization gaming 22    license, the Board shall award no fewer than 110 days of 23    racing.24        During the second year in which only one organization 25    licensee is awarded an organization gaming license, the 26    Board shall award no fewer than 115 racing days.  HB1852- 15 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        During the third year and every year thereafter, in 2    which only one organization licensee is awarded an 3    organization gaming license, the Board shall award no 4    fewer than 120 racing days.5        (2) During the first year in which 2 organization 6    licensees are awarded an organization gaming license, the 7    Board shall award no fewer than 139 total racing days.8        During the second year in which 2 organization 9    licensees are awarded an organization gaming license, the 10    Board shall award no fewer than 160 total racing days.11        During the third year and every year thereafter in 12    which 2 organization licensees are awarded an organization 13    gaming license, the Board shall award no fewer than 174 14    total racing days.15    A Cook County organization licensee shall apply for racing 16dates pursuant to this subsection (e-2). In awarding racing 17dates under this subsection (e-2), the Board shall have the 18discretion to allocate those thoroughbred racing dates among 19these Cook County organization licensees.20    (e-3) In awarding racing dates for calendar year 2020 and 21thereafter in connection with a racetrack in Madison County, 22the Board shall award racing dates and such organization 23licensee shall run at least 700 thoroughbred races at the 24racetrack in Madison County each year. 25    Notwithstanding Section 7.7 of the Illinois Gambling Act 26or any provision of this Act other than subsection (e-4.5),   HB1852- 16 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1for each calendar year for which an organization gaming 2licensee located in Madison County requests racing dates 3resulting in less than 700 live thoroughbred races at its 4racetrack facility, the organization gaming licensee may not 5conduct gaming pursuant to an organization gaming license 6issued under the Illinois Gambling Act for the calendar year 7of such requested live races. 8    (e-4) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7.7 of the 9Illinois Gambling Act or any provision of this Act other than 10subsections (e-3) and (e-4.5), for each calendar year for 11which an organization gaming licensee requests thoroughbred 12racing dates which results in a number of live races under its 13organization license that is less than the total number of 14live races which it conducted in 2017 at its racetrack 15facility, the organization gaming licensee may not conduct 16gaming pursuant to its organization gaming license for the 17calendar year of such requested live races. 18    (e-4.1) Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 7.7 of 19the Illinois Gambling Act or any provision of this Act other 20than subsections (e-3) and (e-4.5), for each calendar year for 21which an organization licensee requests racing dates for 22standardbred racing which results in a number of live races 23that is less than the total number of live races required in 24subsection (e-1), the organization gaming licensee may not 25conduct gaming pursuant to its organization gaming license for 26the calendar year of such requested live races.   HB1852- 17 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    (e-4.5) The Board shall award the minimum live racing 2guarantees contained in subsections (e-1), (e-2), and (e-3) to 3ensure that each organization licensee shall individually run 4a sufficient number of races per year to qualify for an 5organization gaming license under this Act. The General 6Assembly finds that the minimum live racing guarantees 7contained in subsections (e-1), (e-2), and (e-3) are in the 8best interest of the sport of horse racing, and that such 9guarantees may only be reduced in the calendar year in which 10they will be conducted in the limited circumstances described 11in this subsection. The Board may decrease the number of 12racing days without affecting an organization licensee's 13ability to conduct gaming pursuant to an organization gaming 14license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act only if the 15Board determines, after notice and hearing, that: 16        (i) a decrease is necessary to maintain a sufficient 17    number of betting interests per race to ensure the 18    integrity of racing; 19        (ii) there are unsafe track conditions due to weather 20    or acts of God;21        (iii) there is an agreement between an organization 22    licensee and the breed association that is applicable to 23    the involved live racing guarantee, such association 24    representing either the largest number of thoroughbred 25    owners and trainers or the largest number of standardbred 26    owners, trainers and drivers who race horses at the   HB1852- 18 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    involved organization licensee's racing meeting, so long 2    as the agreement does not compromise the integrity of the 3    sport of horse racing; or4        (iv) the horse population or purse levels are 5    insufficient to provide the number of racing opportunities 6    otherwise required in this Act. 7    In decreasing the number of racing dates in accordance 8with this subsection, the Board shall hold a hearing and shall 9provide the public and all interested parties notice and an 10opportunity to be heard. The Board shall accept testimony from 11all interested parties, including any association representing 12owners, trainers, jockeys, or drivers who will be affected by 13the decrease in racing dates. The Board shall provide a 14written explanation of the reasons for the decrease and the 15Board's findings. The written explanation shall include a 16listing and content of all communication between any party and 17any Illinois Racing Board member or staff that does not take 18place at a public meeting of the Board. 19    (e-5) In reviewing an application for the purpose of 20granting an organization license consistent with the best 21interests of the public and the sport of horse racing, the 22Board shall consider: 23        (1) the character, reputation, experience, and 24    financial integrity of the applicant and of any other 25    separate person that either: 26            (i) controls the applicant, directly or   HB1852- 19 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        indirectly, or 2            (ii) is controlled, directly or indirectly, by 3        that applicant or by a person who controls, directly 4        or indirectly, that applicant; 5        (2) the applicant's facilities or proposed facilities 6    for conducting horse racing; 7        (3) the total revenue without regard to Section 32.1 8    to be derived by the State and horsemen from the 9    applicant's conducting a race meeting; 10        (4) the applicant's good faith affirmative action plan 11    to recruit, train, and upgrade minorities in all 12    employment classifications; 13        (5) the applicant's financial ability to purchase and 14    maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance; 15        (6) the applicant's proposed and prior year's 16    promotional and marketing activities and expenditures of 17    the applicant associated with those activities; 18        (7) an agreement, if any, among organization licensees 19    as provided in subsection (b) of Section 21 of this Act; 20    and 21        (8) the extent to which the applicant exceeds or meets 22    other standards for the issuance of an organization 23    license that the Board shall adopt by rule.24    In granting organization licenses and allocating dates for 25horse race meetings, the Board shall have discretion to 26determine an overall schedule, including required simulcasts   HB1852- 20 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1of Illinois races by host tracks that will, in its judgment, be 2conducive to the best interests of the public and the sport of 3horse racing.4    (e-10) The Illinois Administrative Procedure Act shall 5apply to administrative procedures of the Board under this Act 6for the granting of an organization license, except that (1) 7notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of Section 810-40 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act regarding 9cross-examination, the Board may prescribe rules limiting the 10right of an applicant or participant in any proceeding to 11award an organization license to conduct cross-examination of 12witnesses at that proceeding where that cross-examination 13would unduly obstruct the timely award of an organization 14license under subsection (e) of Section 20 of this Act; (2) the 15provisions of Section 10-45 of the Illinois Administrative 16Procedure Act regarding proposals for decision are excluded 17under this Act; (3) notwithstanding the provisions of 18subsection (a) of Section 10-60 of the Illinois Administrative 19Procedure Act regarding ex parte communications, the Board may 20prescribe rules allowing ex parte communications with 21applicants or participants in a proceeding to award an 22organization license where conducting those communications 23would be in the best interest of racing, provided all those 24communications are made part of the record of that proceeding 25pursuant to subsection (c) of Section 10-60 of the Illinois 26Administrative Procedure Act; (4) the provisions of Section   HB1852- 21 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b114a of this Act and the rules of the Board promulgated under 2that Section shall apply instead of the provisions of Article 310 of the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act regarding 4administrative law judges; and (5) the provisions of 5subsection (d) of Section 10-65 of the Illinois Administrative 6Procedure Act that prevent summary suspension of a license 7pending revocation or other action shall not apply.8    (f) The Board may allot racing dates to an organization 9licensee for more than one calendar year but for no more than 3 10successive calendar years in advance, provided that the Board 11shall review such allotment for more than one calendar year 12prior to each year for which such allotment has been made. The 13granting of an organization license to a person constitutes a 14privilege to conduct a horse race meeting under the provisions 15of this Act, and no person granted an organization license 16shall be deemed to have a vested interest, property right, or 17future expectation to receive an organization license in any 18subsequent year as a result of the granting of an organization 19license. Organization licenses shall be subject to revocation 20if the organization licensee has violated any provision of 21this Act or the rules and regulations promulgated under this 22Act or has been convicted of a crime or has failed to disclose 23or has stated falsely any information called for in the 24application for an organization license. Any organization 25license revocation proceeding shall be in accordance with 26Section 16 regarding suspension and revocation of occupation   HB1852- 22 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1licenses.2    (f-5) If, (i) an applicant does not file an acceptance of 3the racing dates awarded by the Board as required under part 4(1) of subsection (h) of this Section 20, or (ii) an 5organization licensee has its license suspended or revoked 6under this Act, the Board, upon conducting an emergency 7hearing as provided for in this Act, may reaward on an 8emergency basis pursuant to rules established by the Board, 9racing dates not accepted or the racing dates associated with 10any suspension or revocation period to one or more 11organization licensees, new applicants, or any combination 12thereof, upon terms and conditions that the Board determines 13are in the best interest of racing, provided, the organization 14licensees or new applicants receiving the awarded racing dates 15file an acceptance of those reawarded racing dates as required 16under paragraph (1) of subsection (h) of this Section 20 and 17comply with the other provisions of this Act. The Illinois 18Administrative Procedure Act shall not apply to the 19administrative procedures of the Board in conducting the 20emergency hearing and the reallocation of racing dates on an 21emergency basis.22    (g) (Blank).23    (h) The Board shall send the applicant a copy of its 24formally executed order by certified mail addressed to the 25applicant at the address stated in his application, which 26notice shall be mailed within 5 days of the date the formal   HB1852- 23 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1order is executed.2    Each applicant notified shall, within 10 days after 3receipt of the final executed order of the Board awarding 4racing dates: 5        (1) file with the Board an acceptance of such award in 6    the form prescribed by the Board; 7        (2) pay to the Board an additional amount equal to 8    $110 for each racing date awarded; and 9        (3) file with the Board the bonds required in Sections 10    21 and 25 at least 20 days prior to the first day of each 11    race meeting.12Upon compliance with the provisions of paragraphs (1), (2), 13and (3) of this subsection (h), the applicant shall be issued 14an organization license.15    If any applicant fails to comply with this Section or 16fails to pay the organization license fees herein provided, no 17organization license shall be issued to such applicant.18(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.) 19    (230 ILCS 5/26)  (from Ch. 8, par. 37-26)20    Sec. 26. Wagering. 21    (a) Any licensee may conduct and supervise the pari-mutuel 22system of wagering, as defined in Section 3.12 of this Act, on 23horse races conducted by an Illinois organization licensee or 24conducted at a racetrack located in another state or country 25in accordance with subsection (g) of Section 26 of this Act.   HB1852- 24 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1Subject to the prior consent of the Board, licensees may 2supplement any pari-mutuel pool in order to guarantee a 3minimum distribution. Such pari-mutuel method of wagering 4shall not, under any circumstances if conducted under the 5provisions of this Act, be held or construed to be unlawful, 6other statutes of this State to the contrary notwithstanding. 7Subject to rules for advance wagering promulgated by the 8Board, any licensee may accept wagers in advance of the day the 9race wagered upon occurs.10    (b) Except for those gaming activities for which a license 11is obtained and authorized under the Illinois Lottery Law, the 12Charitable Games Act, the Raffles and Poker Runs Act, or the 13Illinois Gambling Act, no other method of betting, pool 14making, wagering or gambling shall be used or permitted by the 15licensee. Each licensee may retain, subject to the payment of 16all applicable taxes and purses, an amount not to exceed 17% of 17all money wagered under subsection (a) of this Section, except 18as may otherwise be permitted under this Act.19    (b-5) An individual may place a wager under the 20pari-mutuel system from any licensed location authorized under 21this Act provided that wager is electronically recorded in the 22manner described in Section 3.12 of this Act. Any wager made 23electronically by an individual while physically on the 24premises of a licensee shall be deemed to have been made at the 25premises of that licensee.26    (c) (Blank).  HB1852- 25 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    (c-5) The sum held by any licensee for payment of 2outstanding pari-mutuel tickets, if unclaimed prior to 3December 31 of the next year, shall be retained by the licensee 4for payment of such tickets until that date. Within 10 days 5thereafter, the balance of such sum remaining unclaimed, less 6any uncashed supplements contributed by such licensee for the 7purpose of guaranteeing minimum distributions of any 8pari-mutuel pool, shall be evenly distributed to the purse 9account of the organization licensee and the organization 10licensee, except that the balance of the sum of all 11outstanding pari-mutuel tickets generated from simulcast 12wagering and inter-track wagering by an organization licensee 13located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 14borders the Mississippi River or any licensee that derives its 15license from that organization licensee shall be evenly 16distributed to the purse account of the organization licensee 17and the organization licensee.18    (d) A pari-mutuel ticket shall be honored until December 1931 of the next calendar year, and the licensee shall pay the 20same and may charge the amount thereof against unpaid money 21similarly accumulated on account of pari-mutuel tickets not 22presented for payment.23    (e) No licensee shall knowingly permit any minor, other 24than an employee of such licensee or an owner, trainer, 25jockey, driver, or employee thereof, to be admitted during a 26racing program unless accompanied by a parent or guardian, or   HB1852- 26 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1any minor to be a patron of the pari-mutuel system of wagering 2conducted or supervised by it. The admission of any 3unaccompanied minor, other than an employee of the licensee or 4an owner, trainer, jockey, driver, or employee thereof at a 5race track is a Class C misdemeanor.6    (f) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, an 7organization licensee may contract with an entity in another 8state or country to permit any legal wagering entity in 9another state or country to accept wagers solely within such 10other state or country on races conducted by the organization 11licensee in this State. Beginning January 1, 2000, these 12wagers shall not be subject to State taxation. Until January 131, 2000, when the out-of-State entity conducts a pari-mutuel 14pool separate from the organization licensee, a privilege tax 15equal to 7 1/2% of all monies received by the organization 16licensee from entities in other states or countries pursuant 17to such contracts is imposed on the organization licensee, and 18such privilege tax shall be remitted to the Department of 19Revenue within 48 hours of receipt of the moneys from the 20simulcast. When the out-of-State entity conducts a combined 21pari-mutuel pool with the organization licensee, the tax shall 22be 10% of all monies received by the organization licensee 23with 25% of the receipts from this 10% tax to be distributed to 24the county in which the race was conducted.25    An organization licensee may permit one or more of its 26races to be utilized for pari-mutuel wagering at one or more   HB1852- 27 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1locations in other states and may transmit audio and visual 2signals of races the organization licensee conducts to one or 3more locations outside the State or country and may also 4permit pari-mutuel pools in other states or countries to be 5combined with its gross or net wagering pools or with wagering 6pools established by other states.7    (g) A host track may accept interstate simulcast wagers on 8horse races conducted in other states or countries and shall 9control the number of signals and types of breeds of racing in 10its simulcast program, subject to the disapproval of the 11Board. The Board may prohibit a simulcast program only if it 12finds that the simulcast program is clearly adverse to the 13integrity of racing. The host track simulcast program shall 14include the signal of live racing of all organization 15licensees. All non-host licensees and advance deposit wagering 16licensees shall carry the signal of and accept wagers on live 17racing of all organization licensees. Advance deposit wagering 18licensees shall not be permitted to accept out-of-state wagers 19on any Illinois signal provided pursuant to this Section 20without the approval and consent of the organization licensee 21providing the signal. For one year after August 15, 2014 (the 22effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host licensees may 23carry the host track simulcast program and shall accept wagers 24on all races included as part of the simulcast program of horse 25races conducted at race tracks located within North America 26upon which wagering is permitted. For a period of one year   HB1852- 28 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1after August 15, 2014 (the effective date of Public Act 298-968), on horse races conducted at race tracks located 3outside of North America, non-host licensees may accept wagers 4on all races included as part of the simulcast program upon 5which wagering is permitted. Beginning August 15, 2015 (one 6year after the effective date of Public Act 98-968), non-host 7licensees may carry the host track simulcast program and shall 8accept wagers on all races included as part of the simulcast 9program upon which wagering is permitted. All organization 10licensees shall provide their live signal to all advance 11deposit wagering licensees for a simulcast commission fee not 12to exceed 6% of the advance deposit wagering licensee's 13Illinois handle on the organization licensee's signal without 14prior approval by the Board. The Board may adopt rules under 15which it may permit simulcast commission fees in excess of 6%. 16The Board shall adopt rules limiting the interstate commission 17fees charged to an advance deposit wagering licensee. The 18Board shall adopt rules regarding advance deposit wagering on 19interstate simulcast races that shall reflect, among other 20things, the General Assembly's desire to maximize revenues to 21the State, horsemen purses, and organization licensees. 22However, organization licensees providing live signals 23pursuant to the requirements of this subsection (g) may 24petition the Board to withhold their live signals from an 25advance deposit wagering licensee if the organization licensee 26discovers and the Board finds reputable or credible   HB1852- 29 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1information that the advance deposit wagering licensee is 2under investigation by another state or federal governmental 3agency, the advance deposit wagering licensee's license has 4been suspended in another state, or the advance deposit 5wagering licensee's license is in revocation proceedings in 6another state. The organization licensee's provision of their 7live signal to an advance deposit wagering licensee under this 8subsection (g) pertains to wagers placed from within Illinois. 9Advance deposit wagering licensees may place advance deposit 10wagering terminals at wagering facilities as a convenience to 11customers. The advance deposit wagering licensee shall not 12charge or collect any fee from purses for the placement of the 13advance deposit wagering terminals. The costs and expenses of 14the host track and non-host licensees associated with 15interstate simulcast wagering, other than the interstate 16commission fee, shall be borne by the host track and all 17non-host licensees incurring these costs. The interstate 18commission fee shall not exceed 5% of Illinois handle on the 19interstate simulcast race or races without prior approval of 20the Board. The Board shall promulgate rules under which it may 21permit interstate commission fees in excess of 5%. The 22interstate commission fee and other fees charged by the 23sending racetrack, including, but not limited to, satellite 24decoder fees, shall be uniformly applied to the host track and 25all non-host licensees.26    Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, an   HB1852- 30 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 2association representing the largest number of owners, 3trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 4that organization licensee's racing meeting, may maintain a 5system whereby advance deposit wagering may take place or an 6organization licensee, with the consent of the horsemen 7association representing the largest number of owners, 8trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race horses at 9that organization licensee's racing meeting, may contract with 10another person to carry out a system of advance deposit 11wagering. Such consent may not be unreasonably withheld. Only 12with respect to an appeal to the Board that consent for an 13organization licensee that maintains its own advance deposit 14wagering system is being unreasonably withheld, the Board 15shall issue a final order within 30 days after initiation of 16the appeal, and the organization licensee's advance deposit 17wagering system may remain operational during that 30-day 18period. The actions of any organization licensee who conducts 19advance deposit wagering or any person who has a contract with 20an organization licensee to conduct advance deposit wagering 21who conducts advance deposit wagering on or after January 1, 222013 and prior to June 7, 2013 (the effective date of Public 23Act 98-18) taken in reliance on the changes made to this 24subsection (g) by Public Act 98-18 are hereby validated, 25provided payment of all applicable pari-mutuel taxes are 26remitted to the Board. All advance deposit wagers placed from   HB1852- 31 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1within Illinois must be placed through a Board-approved 2advance deposit wagering licensee; no other entity may accept 3an advance deposit wager from a person within Illinois. All 4advance deposit wagering is subject to any rules adopted by 5the Board. The Board may adopt rules necessary to regulate 6advance deposit wagering through the use of emergency 7rulemaking in accordance with Section 5-45 of the Illinois 8Administrative Procedure Act. The General Assembly finds that 9the adoption of rules to regulate advance deposit wagering is 10deemed an emergency and necessary for the public interest, 11safety, and welfare. An advance deposit wagering licensee may 12retain all moneys as agreed to by contract with an 13organization licensee. Any moneys retained by the organization 14licensee from advance deposit wagering, not including moneys 15retained by the advance deposit wagering licensee, shall be 16paid 50% to the organization licensee's purse account and 50% 17to the organization licensee. With the exception of any 18organization licensee that is owned by a publicly traded 19company that is incorporated in a state other than Illinois 20and advance deposit wagering licensees under contract with 21such organization licensees, organization licensees that 22maintain advance deposit wagering systems and advance deposit 23wagering licensees that contract with organization licensees 24shall provide sufficiently detailed monthly accountings to the 25horsemen association representing the largest number of 26owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred drivers who race   HB1852- 32 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1horses at that organization licensee's racing meeting so that 2the horsemen association, as an interested party, can confirm 3the accuracy of the amounts paid to the purse account at the 4horsemen association's affiliated organization licensee from 5advance deposit wagering. If more than one breed races at the 6same race track facility, then the 50% of the moneys to be paid 7to an organization licensee's purse account shall be allocated 8among all organization licensees' purse accounts operating at 9that race track facility proportionately based on the actual 10number of host days that the Board grants to that breed at that 11race track facility in the current calendar year. To the 12extent any fees from advance deposit wagering conducted in 13Illinois for wagers in Illinois or other states have been 14placed in escrow or otherwise withheld from wagers pending a 15determination of the legality of advance deposit wagering, no 16action shall be brought to declare such wagers or the 17disbursement of any fees previously escrowed illegal.18        (1) Between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 6:30 p.m. an 19    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 20    may supplement the host track simulcast program with 21    additional simulcast races or race programs, provided that 22    between January 1 and the third Friday in February of any 23    year, inclusive, if no live thoroughbred racing is 24    occurring in Illinois during this period, only 25    thoroughbred races may be used for supplemental interstate 26    simulcast purposes. The Board shall withhold approval for   HB1852- 33 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    a supplemental interstate simulcast only if it finds that 2    the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 3    racing. A supplemental interstate simulcast may be 4    transmitted from an inter-track wagering licensee to its 5    affiliated non-host licensees. The interstate commission 6    fee for a supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid 7    by the non-host licensee and its affiliated non-host 8    licensees receiving the simulcast.9        (2) Between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m. an 10    inter-track wagering licensee other than the host track 11    may receive supplemental interstate simulcasts only with 12    the consent of the host track, except when the Board finds 13    that the simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of 14    racing. Consent granted under this paragraph (2) to any 15    inter-track wagering licensee shall be deemed consent to 16    all non-host licensees. The interstate commission fee for 17    the supplemental interstate simulcast shall be paid by all 18    participating non-host licensees.19        (3) Each licensee conducting interstate simulcast 20    wagering may retain, subject to the payment of all 21    applicable taxes and the purses, an amount not to exceed 22    17% of all money wagered. If any licensee conducts the 23    pari-mutuel system wagering on races conducted at 24    racetracks in another state or country, each such race or 25    race program shall be considered a separate racing day for 26    the purpose of determining the daily handle and computing   HB1852- 34 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    the privilege tax of that daily handle as provided in 2    subsection (a) of Section 27. Until January 1, 2000, from 3    the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to this 4    subsection, each inter-track wagering location licensee 5    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 6    simulcast wagering to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation 7    Fund, subject to the provisions of subparagraph (B) of 8    paragraph (11) of subsection (h) of Section 26 of this 9    Act.10        (4) A licensee who receives an interstate simulcast 11    may combine its gross or net pools with pools at the 12    sending racetracks pursuant to rules established by the 13    Board. All licensees combining their gross pools at a 14    sending racetrack shall adopt the takeout percentages of 15    the sending racetrack. A licensee may also establish a 16    separate pool and takeout structure for wagering purposes 17    on races conducted at race tracks outside of the State of 18    Illinois. The licensee may permit pari-mutuel wagers 19    placed in other states or countries to be combined with 20    its gross or net wagering pools or other wagering pools.21        (5) After the payment of the interstate commission fee 22    (except for the interstate commission fee on a 23    supplemental interstate simulcast, which shall be paid by 24    the host track and by each non-host licensee through the 25    host track) and all applicable State and local taxes, 26    except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 of this   HB1852- 35 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    Act, the remainder of moneys retained from simulcast 2    wagering pursuant to this subsection (g), and Section 26.2 3    shall be divided as follows:4            (A) For interstate simulcast wagers made at a host 5        track, 50% to the host track and 50% to purses at the 6        host track.7            (B) For wagers placed on interstate simulcast 8        races, supplemental simulcasts as defined in 9        subparagraphs (1) and (2), and separately pooled races 10        conducted outside of the State of Illinois made at a 11        non-host licensee, 25% to the host track, 25% to the 12        non-host licensee, and 50% to the purses at the host 13        track.14        (6) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 15    contrary, non-host licensees who derive their licenses 16    from a track located in a county with a population in 17    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 18    may receive supplemental interstate simulcast races at all 19    times subject to Board approval, which shall be withheld 20    only upon a finding that a supplemental interstate 21    simulcast is clearly adverse to the integrity of racing.22        (7) Effective January 1, 2017, notwithstanding any 23    provision of this Act to the contrary, after payment of 24    all applicable State and local taxes and interstate 25    commission fees, non-host licensees who derive their 26    licenses from a track located in a county with a   HB1852- 36 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 2    Mississippi River shall retain 50% of the retention from 3    interstate simulcast wagers and shall pay 50% to purses at 4    the track from which the non-host licensee derives its 5    license.6        (7.1) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 7    to the contrary, if no standardbred racing is conducted at 8    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 9    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, all moneys 10    derived by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and 11    inter-track wagering that (1) are to be used for purses 12    and (2) are generated between the hours of 6:30 p.m. and 13    6:30 a.m. during that calendar year shall be paid as 14    follows:15            (A) If the licensee that conducts horse racing at 16        that racetrack requests from the Board at least as 17        many racing dates as were conducted in calendar year 18        2000, 80% shall be paid to its thoroughbred purse 19        account; and20            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 21        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund and shall 22        be paid to purses for standardbred races for Illinois 23        conceived and foaled horses conducted at any county 24        fairgrounds. The moneys deposited into the Fund 25        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 26        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated,   HB1852- 37 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 2        moneys paid to standardbred purses under this Act, and 3        shall not be commingled with other moneys paid into 4        that Fund. The moneys deposited pursuant to this 5        subparagraph (B) shall be allocated as provided by the 6        Department of Agriculture, with the advice and 7        assistance of the Illinois Standardbred Breeders Fund 8        Advisory Board.9        (7.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act 10    to the contrary, if no thoroughbred racing is conducted at 11    a racetrack located in Madison County during any calendar 12    year beginning on or after January 1, 2002, all moneys 13    derived by that racetrack from simulcast wagering and 14    inter-track wagering that (1) are to be used for purses 15    and (2) are generated between the hours of 6:30 a.m. and 16    6:30 p.m. during that calendar year shall be deposited as 17    follows:18            (A) If the licensee that conducts horse racing at 19        that racetrack requests from the Board at least as 20        many racing dates as were conducted in calendar year 21        2000, 80% shall be deposited into its standardbred 22        purse account; and23            (B) Twenty percent shall be deposited into the 24        Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund. Moneys 25        deposited into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse 26        Distribution Fund pursuant to this subparagraph (B)   HB1852- 38 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        shall be paid to Illinois conceived and foaled 2        thoroughbred breeders' programs and to thoroughbred 3        purses for races conducted at any county fairgrounds 4        for Illinois conceived and foaled horses at the 5        discretion of the Department of Agriculture, with the 6        advice and assistance of the Illinois Thoroughbred 7        Breeders Fund Advisory Board. The moneys deposited 8        into the Illinois Colt Stakes Purse Distribution Fund 9        pursuant to this subparagraph (B) shall be deposited 10        within 2 weeks after the day they were generated, 11        shall be in addition to and not in lieu of any other 12        moneys paid to thoroughbred purses under this Act, and 13        shall not be commingled with other moneys deposited 14        into that Fund.15        (8) Notwithstanding any provision in this Act to the 16    contrary, an organization licensee from a track located in 17    a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that 18    borders the Mississippi River and its affiliated non-host 19    licensees shall not be entitled to share in any retention 20    generated on racing, inter-track wagering, or simulcast 21    wagering at any other Illinois wagering facility.22        (8.1) Notwithstanding any provisions in this Act to 23    the contrary, if 2 organization licensees are conducting 24    standardbred race meetings concurrently between the hours 25    of 6:30 p.m. and 6:30 a.m., after payment of all 26    applicable State and local taxes and interstate commission   HB1852- 39 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    fees, the remainder of the amount retained from simulcast 2    wagering otherwise attributable to the host track and to 3    host track purses shall be split daily between the 2 4    organization licensees and the purses at the tracks of the 5    2 organization licensees, respectively, based on each 6    organization licensee's share of the total live handle for 7    that day, provided that this provision shall not apply to 8    any non-host licensee that derives its license from a 9    track located in a county with a population in excess of 10    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River.11        (9) (Blank).12        (10) (Blank).13        (11) (Blank).14        (12) The Board shall have authority to compel all host 15    tracks to receive the simulcast of any or all races 16    conducted at the Springfield or DuQuoin State fairgrounds 17    and include all such races as part of their simulcast 18    programs.19        (13) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Act, 20    in the event that the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 21    Illinois horse races at all wagering facilities in any 22    calendar year is less than 75% of the total Illinois 23    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races at all such 24    wagering facilities for calendar year 1994, then each 25    wagering facility that has an annual total Illinois 26    pari-mutuel handle on Illinois horse races that is less   HB1852- 40 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    than 75% of the total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 2    Illinois horse races at such wagering facility for 3    calendar year 1994, shall be permitted to receive, from 4    any amount otherwise payable to the purse account at the 5    race track with which the wagering facility is affiliated 6    in the succeeding calendar year, an amount equal to 2% of 7    the differential in total Illinois pari-mutuel handle on 8    Illinois horse races at the wagering facility between that 9    calendar year in question and 1994 provided, however, that 10    a wagering facility shall not be entitled to any such 11    payment until the Board certifies in writing to the 12    wagering facility the amount to which the wagering 13    facility is entitled and a schedule for payment of the 14    amount to the wagering facility, based on: (i) the racing 15    dates awarded to the race track affiliated with the 16    wagering facility during the succeeding year; (ii) the 17    sums available or anticipated to be available in the purse 18    account of the race track affiliated with the wagering 19    facility for purses during the succeeding year; and (iii) 20    the need to ensure reasonable purse levels during the 21    payment period. The Board's certification shall be 22    provided no later than January 31 of the succeeding year. 23    In the event a wagering facility entitled to a payment 24    under this paragraph (13) is affiliated with a race track 25    that maintains purse accounts for both standardbred and 26    thoroughbred racing, the amount to be paid to the wagering   HB1852- 41 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    facility shall be divided between each purse account pro 2    rata, based on the amount of Illinois handle on Illinois 3    standardbred and thoroughbred racing respectively at the 4    wagering facility during the previous calendar year. 5    Annually, the General Assembly shall appropriate 6    sufficient funds from the General Revenue Fund to the 7    Department of Agriculture for payment into the 8    thoroughbred and standardbred horse racing purse accounts 9    at Illinois pari-mutuel tracks. The amount paid to each 10    purse account shall be the amount certified by the 11    Illinois Racing Board in January to be transferred from 12    each account to each eligible racing facility in 13    accordance with the provisions of this Section. Beginning 14    in the calendar year in which an organization licensee 15    that is eligible to receive payment under this paragraph 16    (13) begins to receive funds from gaming pursuant to an 17    organization gaming license issued under the Illinois 18    Gambling Act, the amount of the payment due to all 19    wagering facilities licensed under that organization 20    licensee under this paragraph (13) shall be the amount 21    certified by the Board in January of that year. An 22    organization licensee and its related wagering facilities 23    shall no longer be able to receive payments under this 24    paragraph (13) beginning in the year subsequent to the 25    first year in which the organization licensee begins to 26    receive funds from gaming pursuant to an organization   HB1852- 42 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    gaming license issued under the Illinois Gambling Act.2    (h) The Board may approve and license the conduct of 3inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 4wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location licensees 5subject to the following terms and conditions:6        (1) Any person licensed to conduct a race meeting (i) 7    at a track where 60 or more days of racing were conducted 8    during the immediately preceding calendar year or where 9    over the 5 immediately preceding calendar years an average 10    of 30 or more days of racing were conducted annually may be 11    issued an inter-track wagering license; (ii) at a track 12    located in a county that is bounded by the Mississippi 13    River, which has a population of less than 150,000 14    according to the 1990 decennial census, and an average of 15    at least 60 days of racing per year between 1985 and 1993 16    may be issued an inter-track wagering license; (iii) at a 17    track awarded standardbred racing dates; or (iv) at a 18    track located in Madison County that conducted at least 19    100 days of live racing during the immediately preceding 20    calendar year may be issued an inter-track wagering 21    license, unless a lesser schedule of live racing is the 22    result of (A) weather, unsafe track conditions, or other 23    acts of God; (B) an agreement between the organization 24    licensee and the associations representing the largest 25    number of owners, trainers, jockeys, or standardbred 26    drivers who race horses at that organization licensee's   HB1852- 43 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    racing meeting; or (C) a finding by the Board of 2    extraordinary circumstances and that it was in the best 3    interest of the public and the sport to conduct fewer than 4    100 days of live racing. Any such person having operating 5    control of the racing facility may receive inter-track 6    wagering location licenses. An eligible race track located 7    in a county that has a population of more than 230,000 and 8    that is bounded by the Mississippi River may establish up 9    to 18 9 inter-track wagering locations, an eligible race 10    track located in Stickney Township in Cook County may 11    establish up to 16 inter-track wagering locations, and an 12    eligible race track located in Palatine Township in Cook 13    County may establish up to 18 inter-track wagering 14    locations. An eligible racetrack conducting standardbred 15    racing may have up to 16 inter-track wagering locations. 16    An application for said license shall be filed with the 17    Board prior to such dates as may be fixed by the Board. 18    With an application for an inter-track wagering location 19    license there shall be delivered to the Board a certified 20    check or bank draft payable to the order of the Board for 21    an amount equal to $500. The application shall be on forms 22    prescribed and furnished by the Board. The application 23    shall comply with all other rules, regulations and 24    conditions imposed by the Board in connection therewith.25        (2) The Board shall examine the applications with 26    respect to their conformity with this Act and the rules   HB1852- 44 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    and regulations imposed by the Board. If found to be in 2    compliance with the Act and rules and regulations of the 3    Board, the Board may then issue a license to conduct 4    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering to such 5    applicant. All such applications shall be acted upon by 6    the Board at a meeting to be held on such date as may be 7    fixed by the Board.8        (3) In granting licenses to conduct inter-track 9    wagering and simulcast wagering, the Board shall give due 10    consideration to the best interests of the public, of 11    horse racing, and of maximizing revenue to the State.12        (4) Prior to the issuance of a license to conduct 13    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering, the applicant 14    shall file with the Board a bond payable to the State of 15    Illinois in the sum of $50,000, executed by the applicant 16    and a surety company or companies authorized to do 17    business in this State, and conditioned upon (i) the 18    payment by the licensee of all taxes due under Section 27 19    or 27.1 and any other monies due and payable under this 20    Act, and (ii) distribution by the licensee, upon 21    presentation of the winning ticket or tickets, of all sums 22    payable to the patrons of pari-mutuel pools.23        (5) Each license to conduct inter-track wagering and 24    simulcast wagering shall specify the person to whom it is 25    issued, the dates on which such wagering is permitted, and 26    the track or location where the wagering is to be   HB1852- 45 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    conducted.2        (6) All wagering under such license is subject to this 3    Act and to the rules and regulations from time to time 4    prescribed by the Board, and every such license issued by 5    the Board shall contain a recital to that effect.6        (7) An inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track 7    wagering location licensee may accept wagers at the track 8    or location where it is licensed, or as otherwise provided 9    under this Act.10        (8) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 11    not be conducted at any track less than 4 miles from a 12    track at which a racing meeting is in progress.13        (8.1) Inter-track wagering location licensees who 14    derive their licenses from a particular organization 15    licensee shall conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 16    wagering only at locations not otherwise prohibited by 17    law. that are within 160 miles of that race track where the 18    particular organization licensee is licensed to conduct 19    racing. However, inter-track wagering and simulcast 20    wagering shall not be conducted by those licensees at any 21    location within 5 miles of any race track at which a horse 22    race meeting has been licensed in the current year, unless 23    the person having operating control of such race track has 24    given its written consent to such inter-track wagering 25    location licensees, which consent must be filed with the 26    Board at or prior to the time application is made. In the   HB1852- 46 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    case of any inter-track wagering location licensee 2    initially licensed after December 31, 2013, inter-track 3    wagering and simulcast wagering shall not be conducted by 4    those inter-track wagering location licensees that are 5    located outside the City of Chicago at any location within 6    8 miles of any race track at which a horse race meeting has 7    been licensed in the current year, unless the person 8    having operating control of such race track has given its 9    written consent to such inter-track wagering location 10    licensees, which consent must be filed with the Board at 11    or prior to the time application is made. 12        (8.2) Inter-track wagering or simulcast wagering shall 13    not be conducted by an inter-track wagering location 14    licensee at any location within 100 feet of an existing 15    church, an existing elementary or secondary public school, 16    or an existing elementary or secondary private school 17    registered with or recognized by the State Board of 18    Education. The distance of 100 feet shall be measured to 19    the nearest part of any building used for worship 20    services, education programs, or conducting inter-track 21    wagering by an inter-track wagering location licensee, and 22    not to property boundaries. However, inter-track wagering 23    or simulcast wagering may be conducted at a site within 24    100 feet of a church or school if such church or school has 25    been erected or established after the Board issues the 26    original inter-track wagering location license at the site   HB1852- 47 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    in question. Inter-track wagering location licensees may 2    conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering only 3    in areas that are zoned for commercial or manufacturing 4    purposes or in areas for which a special use has been 5    approved by the local zoning authority. However, no 6    license to conduct inter-track wagering and simulcast 7    wagering shall be granted by the Board with respect to any 8    inter-track wagering location within the jurisdiction of 9    any local zoning authority which has, by ordinance or by 10    resolution, prohibited the establishment of an inter-track 11    wagering location within its jurisdiction. However, 12    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering may be 13    conducted at a site if such ordinance or resolution is 14    enacted after the Board licenses the original inter-track 15    wagering location licensee for the site in question.16        (9) (Blank).17        (10) An inter-track wagering licensee or an 18    inter-track wagering location licensee may retain, subject 19    to the payment of the privilege taxes and the purses, an 20    amount not to exceed 17% of all money wagered. Each 21    program of racing conducted by each inter-track wagering 22    licensee or inter-track wagering location licensee shall 23    be considered a separate racing day for the purpose of 24    determining the daily handle and computing the privilege 25    tax or pari-mutuel tax on such daily handle as provided in 26    Section 27.  HB1852- 48 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        (10.1) Except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 2    27 of this Act, inter-track wagering location licensees 3    shall pay 1% of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to 4    the municipality in which such location is situated and 1% 5    of the pari-mutuel handle at each location to the county 6    in which such location is situated. In the event that an 7    inter-track wagering location licensee is situated in an 8    unincorporated area of a county, such licensee shall pay 9    2% of the pari-mutuel handle from such location to such 10    county. Inter-track wagering location licensees must pay 11    the handle percentage required under this paragraph to the 12    municipality and county no later than the 20th of the 13    month following the month such handle was generated.14        (10.2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this 15    Act, with respect to inter-track wagering at a race track 16    located in a county that has a population of more than 17    230,000 and that is bounded by the Mississippi River ("the 18    first race track"), or at a facility operated by an 19    inter-track wagering licensee or inter-track wagering 20    location licensee that derives its license from the 21    organization licensee that operates the first race track, 22    on races conducted at the first race track or on races 23    conducted at another Illinois race track and 24    simultaneously televised to the first race track or to a 25    facility operated by an inter-track wagering licensee or 26    inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its   HB1852- 49 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    license from the organization licensee that operates the 2    first race track, those moneys shall be allocated as 3    follows:4            (A) That portion of all moneys wagered on 5        standardbred racing that is required under this Act to 6        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 7        standardbred races.8            (B) That portion of all moneys wagered on 9        thoroughbred racing that is required under this Act to 10        be paid to purses shall be paid to purses for 11        thoroughbred races.12        (11) (A) After payment of the privilege or pari-mutuel 13    tax, any other applicable taxes, and the costs and 14    expenses in connection with the gathering, transmission, 15    and dissemination of all data necessary to the conduct of 16    inter-track wagering, the remainder of the monies retained 17    under either Section 26 or Section 26.2 of this Act by the 18    inter-track wagering licensee on inter-track wagering 19    shall be allocated with 50% to be split between the 2 20    participating licensees and 50% to purses, except that an 21    inter-track wagering licensee that derives its license 22    from a track located in a county with a population in 23    excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River 24    shall not divide any remaining retention with the Illinois 25    organization licensee that provides the race or races, and 26    an inter-track wagering licensee that accepts wagers on   HB1852- 50 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    races conducted by an organization licensee that conducts 2    a race meet in a county with a population in excess of 3    230,000 and that borders the Mississippi River shall not 4    divide any remaining retention with that organization 5    licensee.6        (B) From the sums permitted to be retained pursuant to 7    this Act each inter-track wagering location licensee shall 8    pay (i) the privilege or pari-mutuel tax to the State; 9    (ii) 4.75% of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track 10    wagering at such location on races as purses, except that 11    an inter-track wagering location licensee that derives its 12    license from a track located in a county with a population 13    in excess of 230,000 and that borders the Mississippi 14    River shall retain all purse moneys for its own purse 15    account consistent with distribution set forth in this 16    subsection (h), and inter-track wagering location 17    licensees that accept wagers on races conducted by an 18    organization licensee located in a county with a 19    population in excess of 230,000 and that borders the 20    Mississippi River shall distribute all purse moneys to 21    purses at the operating host track; (iii) until January 1, 22    2000, except as provided in subsection (g) of Section 27 23    of this Act, 1% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered on 24    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering at each 25    inter-track wagering location licensee facility to the 26    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund, provided that, to the   HB1852- 51 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    extent the total amount collected and distributed to the 2    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund under this subsection (h) 3    during any calendar year exceeds the amount collected and 4    distributed to the Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund during 5    calendar year 1994, that excess amount shall be 6    redistributed (I) to all inter-track wagering location 7    licensees, based on each licensee's pro rata share of the 8    total handle from inter-track wagering and simulcast 9    wagering for all inter-track wagering location licensees 10    during the calendar year in which this provision is 11    applicable; then (II) the amounts redistributed to each 12    inter-track wagering location licensee as described in 13    subpart (I) shall be further redistributed as provided in 14    subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of 15    this Section 26 provided first, that the shares of those 16    amounts, which are to be redistributed to the host track 17    or to purses at the host track under subparagraph (B) of 18    paragraph (5) of subsection (g) of this Section 26 shall 19    be redistributed based on each host track's pro rata share 20    of the total inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering 21    handle at all host tracks during the calendar year in 22    question, and second, that any amounts redistributed as 23    described in part (I) to an inter-track wagering location 24    licensee that accepts wagers on races conducted by an 25    organization licensee that conducts a race meet in a 26    county with a population in excess of 230,000 and that   HB1852- 52 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    borders the Mississippi River shall be further 2    redistributed, effective January 1, 2017, as provided in 3    paragraph (7) of subsection (g) of this Section 26, with 4    the portion of that further redistribution allocated to 5    purses at that organization licensee to be divided between 6    standardbred purses and thoroughbred purses based on the 7    amounts otherwise allocated to purses at that organization 8    licensee during the calendar year in question; and (iv) 8% 9    of the pari-mutuel handle on inter-track wagering wagered 10    at such location to satisfy all costs and expenses of 11    conducting its wagering. The remainder of the monies 12    retained by the inter-track wagering location licensee 13    shall be allocated 40% to the location licensee and 60% to 14    the organization licensee which provides the Illinois 15    races to the location, except that an inter-track wagering 16    location licensee that derives its license from a track 17    located in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 18    and that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide 19    any remaining retention with the organization licensee 20    that provides the race or races and an inter-track 21    wagering location licensee that accepts wagers on races 22    conducted by an organization licensee that conducts a race 23    meet in a county with a population in excess of 230,000 and 24    that borders the Mississippi River shall not divide any 25    remaining retention with the organization licensee. 26    Notwithstanding the provisions of clauses (ii) and (iv) of   HB1852- 53 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    this paragraph, in the case of the additional inter-track 2    wagering location licenses authorized under paragraph (1) 3    of this subsection (h) by Public Act 87-110, those 4    licensees shall pay the following amounts as purses: 5    during the first 12 months the licensee is in operation, 6    5.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location on 7    races; during the second 12 months, 5.25%; during the 8    third 12 months, 5.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 9    6.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 10    6.75%. The following amounts shall be retained by the 11    licensee to satisfy all costs and expenses of conducting 12    its wagering: during the first 12 months the licensee is 13    in operation, 8.25% of the pari-mutuel handle wagered at 14    the location; during the second 12 months, 8.25%; during 15    the third 12 months, 7.75%; during the fourth 12 months, 16    7.25%; and during the fifth 12 months and thereafter, 17    6.75%. For additional inter-track wagering location 18    licensees authorized under Public Act 89-16, purses for 19    the first 12 months the licensee is in operation shall be 20    5.75% of the pari-mutuel wagered at the location, purses 21    for the second 12 months the licensee is in operation 22    shall be 6.25%, and purses thereafter shall be 6.75%. For 23    additional inter-track location licensees authorized under 24    Public Act 89-16, the licensee shall be allowed to retain 25    to satisfy all costs and expenses: 7.75% of the 26    pari-mutuel handle wagered at the location during its   HB1852- 54 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    first 12 months of operation, 7.25% during its second 12 2    months of operation, and 6.75% thereafter.3        (C) There is hereby created the Horse Racing Tax 4    Allocation Fund which shall remain in existence until 5    December 31, 1999. Moneys remaining in the Fund after 6    December 31, 1999 shall be paid into the General Revenue 7    Fund. Until January 1, 2000, all monies paid into the 8    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 9    paragraph (11) by inter-track wagering location licensees 10    located in park districts of 500,000 population or less, 11    or in a municipality that is not included within any park 12    district but is included within a conservation district 13    and is the county seat of a county that (i) is contiguous 14    to the state of Indiana and (ii) has a 1990 population of 15    88,257 according to the United States Bureau of the 16    Census, and operating on May 1, 1994 shall be allocated by 17    appropriation as follows:18            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 19        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 20        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 21        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 22        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 23        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 24        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 25        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 26        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in   HB1852- 55 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 2        representatives of organization licensees conducting 3        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 4        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 5        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 6        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 7        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 8        Association, recommended by that Association; a 9        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 10        Protective Association or any successor organization 11        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 12        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by 13        that Association or that successor organization; and a 14        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 15        Association, recommended by that Association. 16        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 17        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 18        representative of any of the above-named entities has 19        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 20        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 21        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 22        compensation for their services as members but shall 23        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 24        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 25        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 26        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for   HB1852- 56 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 2        Agricultural Fair Act;3            Four-sevenths to park districts or municipalities 4        that do not have a park district of 500,000 population 5        or less for museum purposes (if an inter-track 6        wagering location licensee is located in such a park 7        district) or to conservation districts for museum 8        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 9        is located in a municipality that is not included 10        within any park district but is included within a 11        conservation district and is the county seat of a 12        county that (i) is contiguous to the state of Indiana 13        and (ii) has a 1990 population of 88,257 according to 14        the United States Bureau of the Census, except that if 15        the conservation district does not maintain a museum, 16        the monies shall be allocated equally between the 17        county and the municipality in which the inter-track 18        wagering location licensee is located for general 19        purposes) or to a municipal recreation board for park 20        purposes (if an inter-track wagering location licensee 21        is located in a municipality that is not included 22        within any park district and park maintenance is the 23        function of the municipal recreation board and the 24        municipality has a 1990 population of 9,302 according 25        to the United States Bureau of the Census); provided 26        that the monies are distributed to each park district   HB1852- 57 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        or conservation district or municipality that does not 2        have a park district in an amount equal to 3        four-sevenths of the amount collected by each 4        inter-track wagering location licensee within the park 5        district or conservation district or municipality for 6        the Fund. Monies that were paid into the Horse Racing 7        Tax Allocation Fund before August 9, 1991 (the 8        effective date of Public Act 87-110) by an inter-track 9        wagering location licensee located in a municipality 10        that is not included within any park district but is 11        included within a conservation district as provided in 12        this paragraph shall, as soon as practicable after 13        August 9, 1991 (the effective date of Public Act 14        87-110), be allocated and paid to that conservation 15        district as provided in this paragraph. Any park 16        district or municipality not maintaining a museum may 17        deposit the monies in the corporate fund of the park 18        district or municipality where the inter-track 19        wagering location is located, to be used for general 20        purposes; and21            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 22        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 23        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 24        relation to additional support and finances for the 25        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 26        the several counties of this State and making an   HB1852- 58 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967.2        Until January 1, 2000, all other monies paid into the 3    Horse Racing Tax Allocation Fund pursuant to this 4    paragraph (11) shall be allocated by appropriation as 5    follows:6            Two-sevenths to the Department of Agriculture. 7        Fifty percent of this two-sevenths shall be used to 8        promote the Illinois horse racing and breeding 9        industry, and shall be distributed by the Department 10        of Agriculture upon the advice of a 9-member committee 11        appointed by the Governor consisting of the following 12        members: the Director of Agriculture, who shall serve 13        as chairman; 2 representatives of organization 14        licensees conducting thoroughbred race meetings in 15        this State, recommended by those licensees; 2 16        representatives of organization licensees conducting 17        standardbred race meetings in this State, recommended 18        by those licensees; a representative of the Illinois 19        Thoroughbred Breeders and Owners Foundation, 20        recommended by that Foundation; a representative of 21        the Illinois Standardbred Owners and Breeders 22        Association, recommended by that Association; a 23        representative of the Horsemen's Benevolent and 24        Protective Association or any successor organization 25        thereto established in Illinois comprised of the 26        largest number of owners and trainers, recommended by   HB1852- 59 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        that Association or that successor organization; and a 2        representative of the Illinois Harness Horsemen's 3        Association, recommended by that Association. 4        Committee members shall serve for terms of 2 years, 5        commencing January 1 of each even-numbered year. If a 6        representative of any of the above-named entities has 7        not been recommended by January 1 of any even-numbered 8        year, the Governor shall appoint a committee member to 9        fill that position. Committee members shall receive no 10        compensation for their services as members but shall 11        be reimbursed for all actual and necessary expenses 12        and disbursements incurred in the performance of their 13        official duties. The remaining 50% of this 14        two-sevenths shall be distributed to county fairs for 15        premiums and rehabilitation as set forth in the 16        Agricultural Fair Act;17            Four-sevenths to museums and aquariums located in 18        park districts of over 500,000 population; provided 19        that the monies are distributed in accordance with the 20        previous year's distribution of the maintenance tax 21        for such museums and aquariums as provided in Section 22        2 of the Park District Aquarium and Museum Act; and23            One-seventh to the Agricultural Premium Fund to be 24        used for distribution to agricultural home economics 25        extension councils in accordance with "An Act in 26        relation to additional support and finances for the   HB1852- 60 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        Agricultural and Home Economic Extension Councils in 2        the several counties of this State and making an 3        appropriation therefor", approved July 24, 1967. This 4        subparagraph (C) shall be inoperative and of no force 5        and effect on and after January 1, 2000.6            (D) Except as provided in paragraph (11) of this 7        subsection (h), with respect to purse allocation from 8        inter-track wagering, the monies so retained shall be 9        divided as follows:10                (i) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 11            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 12            derives its license from an organization licensee 13            located in a county with a population in excess of 14            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 15            not conducting its own race meeting during the 16            same dates, then the entire purse allocation shall 17            be to purses at the track where the races wagered 18            on are being conducted.19                (ii) If the inter-track wagering licensee, 20            except an inter-track wagering licensee that 21            derives its license from an organization licensee 22            located in a county with a population in excess of 23            230,000 and bounded by the Mississippi River, is 24            also conducting its own race meeting during the 25            same dates, then the purse allocation shall be as 26            follows: 50% to purses at the track where the   HB1852- 61 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1            races wagered on are being conducted; 50% to 2            purses at the track where the inter-track wagering 3            licensee is accepting such wagers.4                (iii) If the inter-track wagering is being 5            conducted by an inter-track wagering location 6            licensee, except an inter-track wagering location 7            licensee that derives its license from an 8            organization licensee located in a county with a 9            population in excess of 230,000 and bounded by the 10            Mississippi River, the entire purse allocation for 11            Illinois races shall be to purses at the track 12            where the race meeting being wagered on is being 13            held.14        (12) The Board shall have all powers necessary and 15    proper to fully supervise and control the conduct of 16    inter-track wagering and simulcast wagering by inter-track 17    wagering licensees and inter-track wagering location 18    licensees, including, but not limited to, the following:19            (A) The Board is vested with power to promulgate 20        reasonable rules and regulations for the purpose of 21        administering the conduct of this wagering and to 22        prescribe reasonable rules, regulations and conditions 23        under which such wagering shall be held and conducted. 24        Such rules and regulations are to provide for the 25        prevention of practices detrimental to the public 26        interest and for the best interests of said wagering   HB1852- 62 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        and to impose penalties for violations thereof.2            (B) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 3        delegates this power, is vested with the power to 4        enter the facilities of any licensee to determine 5        whether there has been compliance with the provisions 6        of this Act and the rules and regulations relating to 7        the conduct of such wagering.8            (C) The Board, and any person or persons to whom it 9        delegates this power, may eject or exclude from any 10        licensee's facilities, any person whose conduct or 11        reputation is such that his presence on such premises 12        may, in the opinion of the Board, call into the 13        question the honesty and integrity of, or interfere 14        with the orderly conduct of such wagering; provided, 15        however, that no person shall be excluded or ejected 16        from such premises solely on the grounds of race, 17        color, creed, national origin, ancestry, or sex.18            (D) (Blank).19            (E) The Board is vested with the power to appoint 20        delegates to execute any of the powers granted to it 21        under this Section for the purpose of administering 22        this wagering and any rules and regulations 23        promulgated in accordance with this Act.24            (F) The Board shall name and appoint a State 25        director of this wagering who shall be a 26        representative of the Board and whose duty it shall be   HB1852- 63 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1        to supervise the conduct of inter-track wagering as 2        may be provided for by the rules and regulations of the 3        Board; such rules and regulation shall specify the 4        method of appointment and the Director's powers, 5        authority and duties.6            (G) The Board is vested with the power to impose 7        civil penalties of up to $5,000 against individuals 8        and up to $10,000 against licensees for each violation 9        of any provision of this Act relating to the conduct of 10        this wagering, any rules adopted by the Board, any 11        order of the Board or any other action which in the 12        Board's discretion, is a detriment or impediment to 13        such wagering.14        (13) The Department of Agriculture may enter into 15    agreements with licensees authorizing such licensees to 16    conduct inter-track wagering on races to be held at the 17    licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 18    Agriculture. Such agreement shall specify the races of the 19    Department of Agriculture's licensed race meeting upon 20    which the licensees will conduct wagering. In the event 21    that a licensee conducts inter-track pari-mutuel wagering 22    on races from the Illinois State Fair or DuQuoin State 23    Fair which are in addition to the licensee's previously 24    approved racing program, those races shall be considered a 25    separate racing day for the purpose of determining the 26    daily handle and computing the privilege or pari-mutuel   HB1852- 64 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1    tax on that daily handle as provided in Sections 27 and 2    27.1. Such agreements shall be approved by the Board 3    before such wagering may be conducted. In determining 4    whether to grant approval, the Board shall give due 5    consideration to the best interests of the public and of 6    horse racing. The provisions of paragraphs (1), (8), 7    (8.1), and (8.2) of subsection (h) of this Section which 8    are not specified in this paragraph (13) shall not apply 9    to licensed race meetings conducted by the Department of 10    Agriculture at the Illinois State Fair in Sangamon County 11    or the DuQuoin State Fair in Perry County, or to any 12    wagering conducted on those race meetings.13        (14) An inter-track wagering location license 14    authorized by the Board in 2016 that is owned and operated 15    by a race track in Rock Island County shall be transferred 16    to a commonly owned race track in Cook County on August 12, 17    2016 (the effective date of Public Act 99-757). The 18    licensee shall retain its status in relation to purse 19    distribution under paragraph (11) of this subsection (h) 20    following the transfer to the new entity. The pari-mutuel 21    tax credit under Section 32.1 shall not be applied toward 22    any pari-mutuel tax obligation of the inter-track wagering 23    location licensee of the license that is transferred under 24    this paragraph (14).25    (i) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Act, the 26conduct of wagering at wagering facilities is authorized on   HB1852- 65 -LRB104 09431 LNS 19491 b1all days, except as limited by subsection (b) of Section 19 of 2this Act.3(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19; 101-52, eff. 7-12-19; 4101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-109, eff. 7-19-19; 102-558, eff. 58-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22.) 6    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 7becoming law.